District of Columbia statutes.
2-357.06

Fiscal responsibility.

(a)

Every contract modification, change order, or contract price adjustment under a contract with the District shall be subject to prior written certification by the fiscal officer of the entity responsible for funding the project or the contract, or other official responsible for monitoring and reporting upon the status of the costs of the total project budget or contract budget, as to the effect of the contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract price on the total project budget or the total contract budget.

(b)

If the certification of the fiscal officer or other responsible official discloses a resulting increase in the total project budget or the total contract budget, the contracting officer shall not execute or make the contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract price unless:

(1)

Sufficient funds are available therefor; or

(2)

The scope of the project or contract is adjusted so as to permit the degree of completion that is feasible within the total project budget or total contract budget as it existed prior to the contract modification, change order, or adjustment in contract price under consideration.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 706, 58 DCR 1185